Hawaii statutes.
E.
Contributions; Prohibitions; Limits

[§11-351] Contributions, generally.
(a) Monetary contributions and other campaign funds shall be promptly
deposited in a depository institution, as defined by section 412:1-109, duly authorized
to do business in the State, including a bank, savings bank, savings and loan
association, depository financial services loan company, credit union,
intra-Pacific bank, or similar financial institution, the deposits or accounts
of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the
National Credit Union Administration in the name of the candidate, candidate
committee, or noncandidate committee, whichever is applicable.

(b) A candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee, shall not accept a contribution of more than $100 in
cash from a single person without issuing a receipt to the contributor and
keeping a record of the contribution.

(c) Each candidate committee or noncandidate
committee shall disclose the original source of all earmarked funds, the
ultimate recipient of the earmarked funds, and the fact that the funds are
earmarked. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next